Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 26
COUNTY SALES TAX

Sec.

§ 63-2601. Legislative findings. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to Section 4 of S.L. 2003, ch. 363, effective December 31, 2009.

§ 63-2602. Authority for county sales or use tax. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to Section 4 of S.L. 2003, ch. 363, effective December 31, 2009.

§ 63-2603. County property tax relief fund. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to Section 4 of S.L. 2003, ch. 363, effective December 31, 2009.

§ 63-2604. General provisions. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to Section 4 of S.L. 2003, ch. 363, effective December 31, 2009.

§ 63-2605. Collection and administration of local option sales or use taxes by the state tax commission

Distribution. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to Section 4 of S.L. 2003, ch. 363, effective December 31, 2009.

§ 63-2606 — 63-2608. Distribution formula — General provisions — Coordination with city local option nonproperty taxes — Collection and administration of local option sales or use taxes by the state tax commission — Distribution. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2609 — 63-2626. State Lottery Commission. [Repealed.]